Florida, session 2026, SB1218.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âSubsection (21) is added to section 553.73, 14 Florida Statutes, to read: 15 553.73âFlorida Building Code.â 16 (21)âBeginning with the adoption of the 9th edition of the 17 Florida Building Code, the commission shall require that the 18 entire building envelope, including exterior walls, roof, 19 outside doors, skylights, glazing, and glass block, of the 20 following structures meet the impact resistance requirements of 21 the Florida Building Code and be constructed with wind-resistant 22 materials designed and built to withstand wind speeds of 160 23 miles per hour: 24 (a)âR-1 and R-2 multistory residential occupancies 25 containing sleeping units. 26 (b)âNew residences constructed within 5 miles of the 27 coastal mean high-water line. 28 (c)âNew residences constructed in a high-velocity hurricane 29 zone. 30 (d)âBuildings or structures designated or used as hurricane 31 shelters. 32 (e)âRebuilt buildings or structures that meet the criteria 33 in paragraphs (a)-(d) which are deemed uninhabitable or 34 destroyed by wind, flood, hurricane, tropical storm, or fire. 35 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.